Maine, session 132, LD1056.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§8-B, as amended by PL 2003, c. 673, Pt. V, §14
and affected by §29, is further amended to read:
8-B. Prepaid calling service. "Prepaid calling service" means the right to access
exclusively telecommunications services that must be paid for in advance that enables the
origination of calls using an access number or authorization code or both, whether manually
or electronically dialed, and that is sold in predetermined units or dollars, the number of
which declines with use in a known amount. "Prepaid calling service" includes a prepaid
wireless telecommunications service. The sale or recharge of the service is considered a
sale within the State if the transfer for consideration takes place at the vendor's place of
business in the State. If the sale or recharge of prepaid calling service does not take place
at the vendor's place of business, the sale or recharge is deemed to take place at the
customer's shipping address, or if there is no item shipped, at the customer's billing address
or the location associated with the customer's mobile telephone number. The sale of the
service is deemed to occur on the date of the transfer for consideration of the service.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§8-E is enacted to read:
8-E. Prepaid wireless telecommunications service. "Prepaid wireless
telecommunications service" means a cellular or wireless telecommunications service that
must be paid for in advance and is sold in predetermined units or dollars, the number of
which declines with use in a known amount.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §2551, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 673, Pt. V, §25 and
affected by §29, is amended to read:
9. Prepaid calling service. "Prepaid calling service" means the right to access
exclusively telecommunications services that must be paid for in advance and that enables
the origination of calls using an access number or authorization code or both, whether
manually or electronically dialed, and that is sold in predetermined units or dollars, the
number of which declines with use in a known amount has the same meaning as in section
1752, subsection 8-B.
Sec. 4. Retroactivity. This Act applies retroactively to sales occurring on or after
July 1, 2022, except that a service provider tax paid on a prepaid wireless
telecommunications service, as defined in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36, section
1752, subsection 8-E, prior to the effective date of this Act is not eligible to be refunded or
credited based on the exemption from the service provider tax of prepaid wireless
telecommunications services under this Act.